Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-736
Obligation of person entering upon and using land.

Nothing in sections 37-729 to 37-736 limits in any way the obligation of a person entering upon or using the land of another for recreational purposes to exercise due care in his or her use of such land in his or her activities thereon.

Laws 1965, c. 193, § 7, p. 590;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1007;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 350.